Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 25 Doe Mountain Recreation Authority Act of 2012
11-25-118. Dissolution of the corporation.

Whenever the board of directors of the authority, by resolution, determines that there has been substantial compliance with the purposes for which the authority was formed, and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid, then the members of the board of directors shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the authority shall stand dissolved, the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the state, in the manner approved by the board and the state, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to the state. Upon dissolution of the authority, any of its assets shall be distributed as shall be directed by the board and the state, but in no event shall such costs be distributed to any person other than a governmental entity.

Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1 purported to enact title 11, ch. 27. Title 11, chs. 25 and 26 had previously been transferred; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1 was enacted as title 11, ch. 25 by authority of the code commission.

11-25-119. Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that an authority, as a public corporation, might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the organization of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security for the bonds, except as provided in this chapter, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power over same.

Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1 purported to enact title 11, ch. 27. Title 11, chs. 25 and 26 had previously been transferred; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1106, § 1 was enacted as title 11, ch. 25 by authority of the code commission.